Wyoming, session 2025, HB0037.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-4-306(c) is amended to read:

21-4-306. Suspension or expulsion; grounds.

(c) The board of trustees shall, subject to the
case-by-case modification permitted by subsection (d) of
this section, require the district superintendent to expel
from school for a period of one (1) year any student
HB0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0185
determined to violate paragraph (a)(v) of this section. The
board of trustees may require the district superintendent
to expel any student determined to violate paragraph (a)(v)
of this section for more than one (1) year if the district
provides educational services to the expelled student in an
alternative setting after the initial one (1) year period
of expulsion.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0037